Hawaii statutes.
[§451K-15] Prohibited acts; penalties.
(a) No individual shall:

(1) Use in connection with the person's name any
designation tending to imply that the individual is a licensed genetic
counselor unless the individual is duly licensed and authorized under this
chapter; or

(2) Make a representation that the individual is a
licensed genetic counselor during the time the person's license issued under
this chapter is forfeited, inactive, terminated, suspended, or revoked.

(b) Any individual who violates this section
shall be subject to a fine of not more than $1,000 and each day's violation
shall be deemed a separate offense. [L 2009, c 191, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next